Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2184.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MAGNUS VETERANS FOUNDATION.new text end new text begin $900,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of veterans affairs for a grant to Magnus Veterans Foundation to design, construct, renovate, equip, and furnish capital improvements to the Magnus Veterans Wellness Clinic in the city of Dayton. This appropriation includes money for major projects that reconfigure, renovate, and expand existing space; energy efficiency improvements; major projects that preserve or replace HVAC, plumbing, and electrical systems; and other site renovations to support ongoing operations. This appropriation is onetime and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end